Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.005

Legislative finding and declaration.

The legislature finds and declares that the practice of optometry is a learned profession and affects the health, welfare and safety of the people of this state, and should be regulated in the public interest and limited to qualified persons licensed and authorized to practice under the provisions of chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW.

[ 1981 c 58 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 69 s 1.]